District of Columbia statutes.
28-3501

Estate created otherwise than by deed.

An estate, attempted to be created for a greater term than one year in real estate, other than by deed, is an estate by sufferance.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 676, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

History

Estates in land, written instruments, requirements, see §§ 42-306 and 42-522.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 28-3501.
1973 Ed., § 28-3501.

Prior Codifications